Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3524
Criminal justice agencies; fees; assessment.

Criminal justice agencies may assess reasonable fees, not to exceed actual costs, for search, retrieval, storing, maintaining, and copying of criminal justice records and may waive fees at their discretion. When fees for certified copies or other copies, printouts, or photographs of such records are specifically prescribed by law, such specific fees shall apply. All fees collected by the Nebraska State Patrol pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 26;

Laws 1986, LB 851, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 17.